Utah statutes.
53C-2-101.   Central index -- Administration to maintain central index of
trust lands -- Availability to public.
(1)  The administration shall maintain a central index of all trust lands,
including interests therein, and shall make that index available to the
public.
(2)  The index shall include the following information:
(a)  legal description of the land;
(b)  when and from whom the land was acquired;
(c)  where the abstracts, deeds, or other indicia of interest in the property
may be found;
(d)  name of any party holding an interest in the land;
(e)  name of the grantor; and
(f)  nature of the trust's interest in the land.
